Massachusetts, session 194th, H5430.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Hyannis Transportation Center in the town of Hyannis, shall be designated and
known as the Thomas S. Cahir Cape Cod Transportation Center in honor of former State
Representative and former Administrator of the Cape Cod Regional Transit Authority, Thomas
S. Cahir. The Cape Cod Regional Transit Authority shall erect and maintain suitable signage
bearing that designation in compliance with the standards of the authority.
of 1